Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB362.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2814-C. Federal Money for Solar for All Program.-- (a) The authority shall administer and distribute money appropriated by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169, 136 Stat. 1818) for the Solar for All Program. The money in this section shall be appropriated in accordance with and satisfy the authorization requirements of section 1724-H of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(b) Distribution under subsection (a) shall be subject to the following:(1) The authority shall encumber, commit or expend to enable residential solar, storage and related upgrades for qualifying households consistent with Federal guidelines or rules established by the Solar for All Program.(2) The money shall be disbursed in rural, suburban and urban communities and shall be expended reasonably across all counties in a manner consistent with the number of qualifying households.(3) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ENSURE THAT NO MONEY IS USED TO PURCHASE SOLAR PANELS OR OTHER PARTS THAT WERE MANUFACTURED USING FORCED LABOR. AS USED IN THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "FORCED LABOR" MEANS ALL WORK OR SERVICE WHICH IS EXACTED FROM A WORKER UNDER THE MENACE OF A PENALTY FOR THE NONPERFORMANCE OF THE WORK OR SERVICE AND FOR WHICH THE WORKER DOES NOT OFFER THE WORK OR SERVICE VOLUNTARILY. THE TERM INCLUDES FORCED OR INDENTURED CHILD LABOR.(C) THE PENNSYLVANIA PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REGULATIONS PROVIDING FOR THE PROTECTION OF A 20250HB0362PN1052 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RATEPAYER WHO HAS NOT PARTICIPATED IN THE SOLAR FOR ALL PROGRAM FROM CROSS-SUBSIDIZATION UNDER 52 PA. CODE § 75.13(E) (RELATING TO GENERAL PROVISIONS) AND NET METERING.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0362PN1052 - 3 - 1234